Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-353
Taking of wildlife; when authorized.

All conservation officers, all wildlife managers employed by the commission, and all other staff designated by the commission shall be authorized to take any wildlife from the wild that has escaped captivity, is diseased, is needed for scientific study, is considered dangerous to human or livestock health, is damaging agricultural crops, or is otherwise deemed unsuitable to remain in the wild, as stipulated in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 65.